Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 7. Check Fraud

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

32 Am. Jur. 2d False Pretenses §§ 65 to 77.

Constitutionality of “bad check” statute, 16 ALR4th 631.

§ 6-3-701.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Check” means a written unconditional order to pay a sum certain in money drawn on a bank payable on demand and signed by the drawer;

“Knowingly issues” means issuing a check to obtain property or to pay a debt with intent to defraud or deceive any other person;

“Drawee” means the bank or purported bank upon which a check is drawn;

“Drawer” means a person either real or fictitious whose name appears on a check as the primary obligor whether the actual signature is that of himself or of a person authorized to draw the check in his behalf;

“Insufficient funds” means when the drawer issues a check from the drawee and has no checking account with the drawee or has funds or credit in a checking account with the drawee in an amount less than the amount of the check plus the amount of all other checks outstanding at the time of issuance. A check dishonored for “no account”, “account closed” or “nonsufficient funds” shall also be deemed to be dishonored for “insufficient funds”;

“Issue” means make, draw, deliver or pass a check.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1985, ch. 128, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Intent to defraud. —

Intent to defraud can be inferred under the circumstances, and crime is committed when check is furnished with the requisite intent. Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

Insufficient evidence. —

Defendant's check fraud conviction was reversed as the facts did not support a conviction for check fraud as defined under Wyoming law; defendant's name did not appear on the check as the primary obligor and the check was not an unconditional order to pay.
Rodgers v. State, 2011 WY 158, 265 P.3d 235,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2011).

Essential element is that check was knowingly issued. —

An essential element of check fraud, which state has the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt, is that check must have been knowingly issued, which statute defines as issued “with intent to defraud or deceive.” Cox v. State, 964 P.2d 1235,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); Huff v. State, 992 P.2d 1071,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-702.
Fraud by check; penalties.

Any person who knowingly issues a check which is not paid because the drawer has insufficient funds or credit with the drawee has issued a fraudulent check and commits fraud by check.

Fraud by check is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the fraudulent check was for a sum of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); or

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 3.

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the fraudulent check was for the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more, or if the offender is convicted of fraud by check involving two (2) or more checks issued within any sixty (60) day period in the state of Wyoming totaling one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more in the aggregate.

Renumbered as

7-9-112

by Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 96, § 2; ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to restitution following conviction for fraud by check, formerly contained in subsection (c), see §

7-9-112

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b)(i) and (iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

Constitutionality. —

Former statute did not violate either the due process clause of U.S. Const., amend. 14, nor the due process clause of art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const.State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

Former statute did not, on its face, unconstitutionally discriminate against indigents as a class on the grounds that only indigents cannot pay an insufficient funds check within 10 days of receiving notice of dishonor or nonpayment; thus, section did not violate the equal protection clause of U.S. Const., amend. 14. 14. State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

Since a criminal intent to deceitfully issue an insufficient funds check is an essential element of the crime, the statute does not violate art. 1, § 5, Wyo Const., prohibiting imprisonment for debt. State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

Legislative intent was to create two separate crimes, forgery and check fraud.

The forgery prohibition is against the making of a deceptive document per se, and that of the check fraud is against the making of a document having validity other than the fact that the funds against which it is drawn are “insufficient.” The defendant, who attempted to pass a check which was not genuine (i.e., it was signed by him under a fictitious name and was on a bank in which he did not have an account and in which there was no account under the fictitious name) was properly charged. Binger v. State, 712 P.2d 349,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1986).

Essential element is that check was knowingly issued. —

An essential element of check fraud, which state has the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt, is that check must have been knowingly issued, which statute defines as issued “with intent to defraud or deceive.” Cox v. State, 964 P.2d 1235,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1998).

Obtaining property not necessary element of former statute.—

Obtaining property was never a necessary element of a violation of former check fraud statute, while the obtaining of property is always a necessary element of the false-pretenses statute. Barker v. State, 599 P.2d 1349,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 451

(Wyo. 1979) (decided under former law).

No fatal variance between complaint and information allegingdifferent dates for checks. —

Both the complaint and information charged check by fraud, the only difference being a variance between some underlying facts, the complaint indicating that the checks relied on were issued on and after a certain date, while the information, together with the bill of particulars, indicated that the checks relied on were issued on and before that same date. There was no fatal variance between the complaint and information. Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985).

Bank's demand that overdraft balance be paid sufficient noticeof unpaid check. —

The former notice provision at the end of subsection (a), i.e., “unless the check is paid by the maker within five (5) days of receiving notice,” was minimally complied with under the following circumstances: the bank notified the defendant that her account had been closed because of “excessive overdraft activity,” and demanded payment of a substantial overdraft balance within 10 days, which balance was greater than a recent bad check that, together with other bad checks, totaled more than $500. In any case, the notice provision was a procedural requirement, not an element of the offense. Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under facts existing prior to 1984 amendment).

No evidence of expectation that check would be paid. —

Where defendant failed to present any evidence of a reasonable expectation that his check would be paid on presentation, his conviction for check fraud was affirmed. Cox v. State, 964 P.2d 1235,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1998).

Insufficient evidence of defendant's failure to pay check.—

Insufficient evidence was presented from which a jury could conclude beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant committed check fraud because the State presented insufficient evidence to show defendant failed to pay the checks within five days after receiving notice and demand for payment. Lapp v. State, 2004 WY 142, 100 P.3d 862,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2004).

Insufficient evidence. —

Defendant's check fraud conviction was reversed as the facts did not support a conviction for check fraud as defined under Wyoming law; defendant's name did not appear on the check as the primary obligor and the check was not an unconditional order to pay.
Rodgers v. State, 2011 WY 158, 265 P.3d 235,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2011).

No constitutional violation with a permissive presumption.—

Although the words “prima facie” were excluded from the jury instruction that tracked the language of §

6-3-703

, defendant's rights were not violated because the instruction included a permissive presumption, not a mandatory presumption. Huff v. State, 992 P.2d 1071,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1999).

As to review of sentence, within statutory limits, for clear abuse of discretion,

see Hedge v. State, 696 P.2d 51,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1985).

Applied

in

Geiser v. State, 920 P.2d 1243,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Milladge v. State, 900 P.2d 1156,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Black v. State, 869 P.2d 1137,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1994); Pearl v. State, 996 P.2d 688,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2000); Shaw v. State, 998 P.2d 965,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2000); Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of “bad check” statute, 16 ALR4th 631.

§ 6-3-703.
Prima facie evidence of intent that check not to be paid; evidence of knowledge of account balance.

Any of the following is prima facie evidence that the person at the time he issued the check or other order for the payment of money intended that it should not be paid:

Proof that at the time of issuance he did not have an account with the drawee;

Proof that at the time of issuance he did not have sufficient funds with the drawee and that he failed to pay the check or other order within five (5) days after receiving notice of nonpayment or dishonor, personally given or sent to the address shown on the check or other order; or

Proof that when presentment was made in a reasonable time the issuer did not have sufficient funds with the drawee and he failed to pay the check or other order within five (5) days after receiving notice of nonpayment or dishonor, personally given or sent to the address shown on the check or other order.

Proof the drawer opened an account with the drawee on a certain date shall be considered evidence of the drawer’s knowledge of the account balance on that date.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 96, § 2; 1984, ch. 44, § 2.

No constitutional violation with a permissive presumption.—

Although the words “prima facie” were excluded from the jury instruction that tracked the language of this section, defendant's constitutional rights were not violated because the instruction included a permissive presumption, not a mandatory presumption. Huff v. State, 992 P.2d 1071,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1999).

Applied

in

Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); Cox v. State, 964 P.2d 1235,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “Collecting Debt in Wyoming: The Fair Debt Collection Practices Act as a Trap for the Unwary,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 731 (1996).

§ 6-3-704.
Acquirer of right to check with insufficient funds may file complaint; deferred prosecution or probation and restitution on checks.

Any person, having acquired rights with respect to a check which is not paid because the drawer has insufficient funds, may file a complaint under this act whether or not he is the payee, holder or bearer of the check.

If deferred prosecution or probation is ordered, the court as a condition of supervision shall require the defendant to make restitution in an amount not to exceed twice the amount of the dishonored check on all checks issued by the defendant which are unpaid as of the date of commencement of the supervision in addition to other terms and conditions appropriate for the treatment or rehabilitation of the defendant.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 96, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

6-1-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restitutional sentencing under Victim and Witness Protection Act § 5 (18 USC §§ 3579, 3580 [ 18 USC §§ 3663, 3664]), 79 ALR Fed 724.

§ 6-3-705.
Liability of drawee for release of information to payee, holder or official; liability of person committing fraud to holder.

A drawee is not civilly or criminally liable for releasing the following information relating to the drawer’s account to any payee or holder of a check that has been dishonored for insufficient funds, upon the written request of any payee or holder:

The status of the account, and whether the drawer had sufficient funds or credit with the drawee at the time the check was issued or presented for payment; and

The current home and business addresses and telephone numbers of the drawer.

A drawee is not civilly or criminally liable for releasing the following information relating to the drawer’s account to any law enforcement or prosecuting official or agent thereof who first certifies in writing that he is investigating a complaint against the drawer under this section:

Documents relating to the opening of the account by the drawer;

Correspondence between the drawer and the drawee relating to the status of the account;

Periodic statements delivered to the drawer by the drawee for the two (2) periods prior to and subsequent to the issuance of any check which is the subject of such investigation;

The current home and business addresses and telephone numbers of the drawer; and

Copies of other documents showing examples of signatures of the drawer.

Any person who commits fraud by check is liable to the holder of the check for the sum of the check plus interest, costs of collection and reasonable collection fees.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-706.
Bank not liable for release of information on drawer's account after warrant issued.

After a warrant has been issued against a drawer, a bank is not civilly or criminally liable for releasing information relating to the drawer’s account to a sheriff, deputy sheriff, under sheriff, police officer, prosecuting attorney, assistant prosecuting attorney, deputy prosecuting attorney or authorized investigator or detective for a prosecuting attorney, sheriff’s office or police department investigating or prosecuting a charge under this article.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).